District of Columbia statutes.
29-303.02

General powers.

Unless its articles of incorporation provide otherwise, every corporation shall have perpetual duration and succession in its corporate name and shall have the same powers as an individual to do all things necessary or convenient to carry out its activities and affairs, including power to:

(1)

Sue and be sued, and defend in its corporate name;

(2)

Have a corporate seal, which may be altered at will, and to use it, or a facsimile of it, by impressing or affixing it or in any other manner reproducing it;

(3)

Make and amend bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of the District, for managing the business and regulating the affairs of the corporation;

(4)

Purchase, receive, lease, or otherwise acquire, and own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal with, property, or any legal or equitable interest in property, wherever located;

(5)

Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property;

(6)

Purchase, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire; own, hold, vote, use, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of; and deal in and with shares or other interests in, or obligations of, any other entity;

(7)

Make contracts and guarantees, incur liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, which may be convertible into or include the option to purchase other securities of the corporation, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of any of its property, franchises, or income;

(8)

Lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and receive and hold real and personal property as security for repayment;

(9)

Be a promoter, partner, member, associate, or manager of any partnership, joint venture, trust, or other entity;

(10)

Conduct its business, locate offices, and exercise the powers granted by this chapter within or without the District;

(11)

Elect directors and appoint officers, employees, and agents of the corporation, define their duties, fix their compensation, and lend them money and credit;

(12)

Pay pensions and establish pension plans, pension trusts, profit sharing plans, share bonus plans, share option plans, and benefit or incentive plans for any or all of its current or former directors, officers, employees, and agents;

(13)

Make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific, or educational purposes;

(14)

Do any lawful business that will aid governmental policy; and

(15)

Make payments or donations, or do any other act, not inconsistent with law, that furthers the activities and affairs of the corporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(c)(4), 59 DCR 13171
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “activities” for “business” in the introductory language and in (15); and deleted “real or personal” preceding the first appearance of “property” in (4).
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.